changeN.twol
Alphabet

A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü V Y Z Q Ə X
a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş t u ü v y z q ə x
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{Q%}
%{C%}:c
%{N%}:d
%{K%}
%{SPC%}
%{D%}
%{DASH%}
%-
;

Sets

Cons = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P R S Ş T V Y Z Q X 
		b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s ş t v y z q x %{Q%} %{K%}; 

back = A I O U 
		a ı o u ;

front = E İ Ö Ü Ə
		e i ö ü ə ;


Rules

"ChangeN"

%{N%}:n <=>  [ m: | n: ] [%-: ]+ _ ;

"ChangeQ"
%{Q%}:%{K%} <=> [front: ] _  ;

"ChangeC"
%{C%}:ç <=> [back: ] [Cons: ]* [%-: ]* _ ;
